Utah statutes.
58-17b-301.   License required -- License classifications for individuals.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of pharmacy, telepharmacy, or the practice of a pharmacy technician, except as specifically provided in Section 58-1-307 or 58-17b-309.

(2)  The division shall issue to an individual who qualifies under this chapter a license in the classification of:

(a)  pharmacist;

(b)  pharmacy intern; or

(c)  pharmacy technician.

